it: Sistema di accordatura del djembe: Meccanico a tiranti; Preaccordato (fisso); Con corde (tradizionale); Altro
lt-LT: Djembe derinimo sistema: Mechaninis derinimas varžtais; Iš anksto suderintas (fiksuotas); Derinamas virve (tradicinis); Kita
da: Djembe-stemmesystem: Mekanisk stemt med beslag; Forudstemt (fast); Rebstemt (traditionelt); Andet
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação do djembê: Afinação mecânica por tensão; Pré-afinado (fixo); Afinado por corda (tradicional); Outro
hu: Dzsembe hangolási rendszer: Mechanikus hangolócsavaros; Előre hangolt (fix); Köteles hangolású (hagyományos); Egyéb
de: Stimmsystem der Djembe: Mechanisch mit Spannböckchen gestimmt; Vorgestimmt (fest); Seilgestimmt (traditionell); Sonstige
hr-HR: Sustav za ugađanje djembea: Mehaničko ugađanje (vijci); Unaprijed ugođeno (fiksno); Ugađanje užetom (tradicionalno); Ostalo
es: Sistema de afinación del djembé: Afinación mecánica por orejetas; Preafinado (fijo); Afinación por cuerdas (tradicional); Otro
fi: Djembe-viritysjärjestelmä: Mekaaninen viritysruuveilla; Esiviritetty (kiinteä); Naruilla viritettävä (perinteinen); Muu
pt-BR: Sistema de afinação do djembê: Afinação mecânica por parafusos; Pré-afinado (fixo); Afinação por corda (tradicional); Outro
nl: Djembe stemsysteem: Mechanisch met spanklauwen; Vooraf gestemd (vast); Gespannen met touw (traditioneel); Overig
en: Djembe tuning system: Mechanical lug-tuned; Pre-tuned (fixed); Rope-tuned (traditional); Other
th: ระบบปรับเสียงกลองเจมเบ้: จูนด้วยสลักเกลียวกลไก; จูนล่วงหน้า (ตายตัว); จูนด้วยเชือก (ดั้งเดิม); อื่นๆ
ko: 젬베 튜닝 시스템: 기계식 러그 튜닝; 사전 튜닝(고정); 로프 튜닝(전통); 기타
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος τζέμπε: Μηχανικό (κούρδισμα με κλειδί); Προκουρδισμένο (σταθερό); Κούρδισμα με σχοινιά (παραδοσιακό); Άλλο
vi: Hệ thống điều chỉnh âm thanh trống Djembe: Chỉnh âm bằng ốc vít cơ học; Chỉnh âm sẵn (cố định); Chỉnh âm bằng dây thừng (truyền thống); Khác
sk-SK: Ladiaci systém bubna djembe: Mechanické (ladené skrutkami); Predladené (pevné); Ladené povrazom (tradičné); Iné
ru: Система настройки джембе: Механическая настройка лагами; Предварительно настроенный (фиксированный); Настройка веревками (традиционная); Другое
sv: Djembe-stämningssystem: Mekaniskt stämd (med skruvar); Förstämd (fast); Repstämd (traditionell); Övrigt
bg-BG: Система за настройка на джембе: Механично с лъгове; Предварително настроен (фиксиран); С въжета (традиционно); Друго
ja: ジェンベのチューニングシステム: 機械式ラグチューニング; プリチューニング (固定式); ロープチューニング (伝統的); その他
zh-TW: 非洲鼓調音系統: 機械鼓耳調音; 預先調音 (固定式); 繩索調音 (傳統式); 其他
nb: Djembe-stemmingssystem: Mekanisk stemmeskrue; Forhåndsstemt (fast); Taustemt (tradisjonelt); Annet
sl-SI: Sistem za uglaševanje Djembeja: Mehansko uglaševanje z vijaki; Predhodno uglašeno (fiksno); Uglaševanje z vrvjo (tradicionalno); Drugo
tr: Djembe akort sistemi: Mekanik vidalı akort; Önceden akortlu (sabit); İple akort (geleneksel); Diğer
pl: System strojenia djembe: Strojony mechanicznie śrubami; Wstępnie nastrojony (stały); Strojony sznurkiem (tradycyjny); Inny
cs: Ladicí systém Djembe: Laděné mechanickými šrouby; Předladěné (pevné); Laděné provazy (tradiční); Ostatní
zh-CN: 非洲鼓调音系统: 机械拉耳调音; 预调音 (固定); 绳索调音 (传统); 其他
fr: Système d’accordage du djembé: Accordage mécanique par tirants; Pré-accordé (fixe); Accordage par cordage (traditionnel); Autre
ro-RO: Sistem de acordare pentru djembe: Acordare mecanică cu șuruburi; Pre-acordat (fix); Acordat cu sfoară (tradițional); Altele